District of Columbia statutes.
8-233.03

Retailer obligations.

(a)

Beginning September 1, 2016, or within 2 months of the Mayor’s first website publication of the list required under § 8-233.04(d), whichever is later, a retailer shall not sell or offer for sale paint to a person in the District unless the producer or the paint brand was listed on the website maintained by the Mayor under § 8-233.04(d) on the date the paint was ordered from the paint producer or the producer’s agent.

(b)

A paint retailer may participate on a voluntary basis as paint collection points pursuant to a paint stewardship program.

History

Mar. 11, 2015, D.C. Law 20-205, § 4, 61 DCR 12587